Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.045

Claim for wages—Action upon surety bond or security.

(1) Any person, having a claim for wages pursuant to this chapter may bring suit upon the surety bond or security deposit filed by the contractor pursuant to RCW 19.30.040, in any court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which the claim arose, or in which either the claimant or contractor resides.

(2) The right of action is assignable in the name of the director or any other person.

[ 1987 c 216 s 2; 1986 c 197 s 19.]